Washington statutes.
RCW 13.38.120

Right to examine reports, other documents.

Each party to a child custody proceeding involving an Indian child shall have the right to examine all reports or other documents filed with the court upon which any decision with respect to the proceeding may be based.

[ 2011 c 309 s 12.]